src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON adjectives
арлыдтӧм:арлыдтӧм A-IS_TOM  "alaikäinen" ;
артасьысь:артасьысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "pikkumainen" ;
асывъя:асывъя A_  "aamuinen" ;
битӧм:битӧм A-IS_TOM  "tuleton" ;
больӧдчысь:больӧдчысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "jutteleva" ;
брӧд% кӧтасьӧм:брӧд% кӧтасьӧм A_  "likomärkä" ;
бурасьлытӧм:бурасьлытӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "leppymätön" ;
бытшкалана:бытшкалана Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "pisteliäs" ;
бӧрса:бӧрса A_  "viimeinen" ;
бӧръяна:бӧръяна Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "" ;
варттӧм:варттӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "puimaton" ;
вежласяна:вежласяна Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "vaihtelevainen" ;
вежыня:вежыня A_  "käyrä" ;
велӧдтӧм:велӧдтӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "" ;
веритана:веритана Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "vakuuttava" ;
весавтӧм:весавтӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "puhdistamaton" ;
ветлытӧм-мунтӧм:ветлытӧм-мунтӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "minnekään menemätön" ;
видз-мутӧм:видз-мутӧм A-IS_TOM  "" ;
вижӧдлытӧм:вижӧдлытӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "ikivihreä" ;
вильса:вильса A_  "" ;
висьтасяна:висьтасяна Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "" ;
висьӧдтӧм:висьӧдтӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "" ;
волнуйтана:волнуйтана Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "liikuttava" ;
вольк:вольк A_  "liukas" ;
вороптӧм:вороптӧм A-IS_TOM  "kädensijaton" ;
вынсьӧдтӧм:вынсьӧдтӧм A_  "" ;
вӧдиттӧм:вӧдиттӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "muokaamaton" ;
вӧрастӧм:вӧрастӧм A-IS_TOM  "" ;
гогйӧдлана:гогйӧдлана A_  "nyökytellen" ;
гогнавтӧм:гогнавтӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "" ;
горттӧм-позтӧм:горттӧм-позтӧм A-IS_TOM  "" ;
гырдӧсь:гырдӧсь A_  "verinen??" ;
гӧртӧм-кӧдзтӧм:гӧртӧм-кӧдзтӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "muokkaamaton" ;
дась:дась A_  "valmis" ;
деньгатӧм:деньгатӧм A-IS_TOM  "" ;
дзенгана:дзенгана Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "" ;
дзирдалана:дзирдалана Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "säteilevä" ;
дивитана:дивитана Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "moittiva" ;
довъялана:довъялана Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "keinuva" ;
дон:дон A_  "" ;
донйыштана:донйыштана Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "" ;
донъясьысь:донъясьысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "" ;
дорӧсалысь:дорӧсалысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "" ;
дрӧжжитана:дрӧжжитана Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "" ;
дурысь:дурысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "" ;
еджыд% водздӧраа:еджыд% водздӧраа A_  "" ;
желлясьысь:желлясьысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "" ;
желлясяна:желлясяна Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "" ;
заводиттӧм:заводиттӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "" ;
зорӧдавтӧм:зорӧдавтӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "aumaamaton" ;
зывӧктӧдана:зывӧктӧдана A_  "" ;
изъянтӧм:изъянтӧм A-IS_TOM  "" ;
ислалысь:ислалысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "" ;
йиттӧм:йиттӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "" ;
йӧв% еджыд:йӧв% еджыд A_  "" ;
каттьысяна:каттьысяна Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "" ;
кежся:кежся A_  "" ;
кежысь:кежысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "" ;
келалысь:келалысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "" ;
кертӧм:кертӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "muokkaamaton" ;
кизьтӧм:кизьтӧм A-IS_TOM  "" ;
кисьмысь:кисьмысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "kypsyvä" ;
ковтыстӧм:ковтыстӧм A-IS_TOM  "" ;
код:код A_  "humalainen" ;
кольмӧдысь:кольмӧдысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "" ;
кольччылысь:кольччылысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "" ;
кос% мыгӧра:кос% мыгӧра A_  "hoikka" ;
косьмытӧм:косьмытӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "" ;
куим% сэрӧга:куим% сэрӧга A_  "" ;
куйлана:куйлана Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "makaava" ;
кукъявлытӧм:кукъявлытӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "poikimaton" ;
курдӧдана:курдӧдана Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "" ;
курзьӧдана:курзьӧдана Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "" ;
куснясьысь:куснясьысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "" ;
кутчысяна:кутчысяна Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "" ;
кывсьысь:кывсьысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "kuuluisa" ;
кынмывлытӧм:кынмывлытӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "jäätymätön" ;
кынӧмтӧм:кынӧмтӧм A-IS_TOM  "" ;
кыскысь:кыскысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "" ;
кӧрта:кӧрта A_  "rauta-" ;
кӧрымтӧм:кӧрымтӧм A-IS_TOM  "" ;
ладмӧдчысь:ладмӧдчысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "myöntyväinen" ;
лысьтытӧм:лысьтытӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "lypsämätön" ;
лэчмысь:лэчмысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "" ;
ляксьытӧм:ляксьытӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "" ;
лӧз% околыша:лӧз% околыша A_  "sinireunainen" ;
мамтӧм:мамтӧм A-IS_TOM  "" ;
медбӧб:медбӧб Adj-IS_SUPERL  "hulluin" ;
медбӧръя:медбӧръя Adj-IS_SUPERL  "viimeinen" ;
медваж:медваж Adj-IS_SUPERL  "vanhin" ;
медвизув:медвизул Adj-IS_SUPERL  "nopein" ;
медвильыд:медвильыд Adj-IS_SUPERL  "liukkain" ;
медводдза:медводдза Adj-IS_SUPERL  "ensimmäinen" ;
медвостер:медвостер Adj-IS_SUPERL  "rohkein" ;
медвылысса:медвылысса Adj-IS_SUPERL  "" ;
медвыль:медвыль Adj-IS_SUPERL  "uusin" ;
медгажа:медгажа Adj-IS_SUPERL  "iloisin" ;
медгора:медгора Adj-IS_SUPERL  "äänekkäin" ;
медгуся:медгуся Adj-IS_SUPERL  "salaisin" ;
медгырысь:медгырысь Adj-IS_SUPERL  "suurin" ;
медгӧль:медгӧль Adj-IS_SUPERL  "köyhin" ;
медджуджыд:медджуджыд Adj-IS_SUPERL  "korkein" ;
меддонтӧм:меддонтӧм Adj-IS_SUPERL  "halvin" ;
медзбой:медзбой Adj-IS_SUPERL  "nokkelin" ;
медколан:медколан Adj-IS_SUPERL  "tarpeellisin" ;
медкӧдзыд:медкӧдзыд Adj-IS_SUPERL  "kylmin" ;
медлёк:медлёк Adj-IS_SUPERL  "pahin" ;
медлӧсьыд:медлӧсьыд Adj-IS_SUPERL  "mukavin" ;
медматысса:медматысса Adj-IS_SUPERL  "lähin" ;
медмисьтӧм:медмисьтӧм Adj-IS_SUPERL  "rumin" ;
медмудер:медмудер Adj-IS_SUPERL  "viekkain" ;
медозыр:медозыр Adj-IS_SUPERL  "rikkain" ;
медпосни:медпосни Adj-IS_SUPERL  "pienin" ;
медпӧрысь:медпӧрысь Adj-IS_SUPERL  "vanhin" ;
медсьӧкыд:медсьӧкыд Adj-IS_SUPERL  "vaikein" ;
медтыдалана:медтыдалана Adj-IS_SUPERL  "näkyvin" ;
медтӧдчана:медтӧдчана Adj-IS_SUPERL  "huomattavin" ;
медшӧр:медшӧр Adj-IS_SUPERL  "keskeisin" ;
медъён:медъён Adj-IS_SUPERL  "kovin" ;
медічӧт:медічӧт Adj-IS_SUPERL  "pienin" ;
мезда:мезда A_  "vapaa" ;
мужскӧй% рода:мужскӧй% рода A_  "maskuliininen" ;
муртӧстӧм:муртӧстӧм A-IS_TOM  "" ;
мӧркӧтнӧ:мӧркӧтнӧ A-PRED  "" ;
назгысь:назгысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "honottava" ;
нартитысь:нартитысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "" ;
наянлунтӧм:наянлунтӧм A-IS_TOM  "" ;
нимлуна:нимлуна A_  "nimipäiväinen" ;
новлытӧм:новлытӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "" ;
нюжалысь:нюжалысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "" ;
нюмъялысь:нюмъялысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "" ;
няйтчысь:няйтчысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "" ;
няньтӧм:няньтӧм A-IS_TOM  "" ;
нярзьытӧм:нярзьытӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "" ;
овлана:овлана Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "" ;
омӧлиник:омӧлиник A_  "kehno" ;
онтӧм:онтӧм A-IS_TOM  "" ;
оравлытӧм:оравлытӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "" ;
орана:орана Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "" ;
оръясяна:оръясяна Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "" ;
пасьвартӧм:пасьвартӧм A-IS_TOM  "" ;
пасьтавлытӧм:пасьтавлытӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "" ;
пиньтӧм:пиньтӧм A-IS_TOM  "hampaaton" ;
повтӧм:повтӧм A_  "peloton" ;
пожнавтӧм:пожнавтӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "" ;
помтӧм-дортӧм:помтӧм-дортӧм A-IS_TOM  "" ;
прӧвериттӧм:прӧвериттӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "tarkastamaton" ;
пыдӧстӧм:пыдӧстӧм A-IS_TOM  "" ;
пӧжассьытӧм:пӧжассьытӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "" ;
пӧръясьтӧм:пӧръясьтӧм A-IS_TOM  "" ;
пӧськодь:пӧськодь A_  "" ;
ректытӧм:ректытӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "" ;
сетчысь:сетчысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "" ;
сибавтӧм:сибавтӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "" ;
сигӧртӧм:сигӧртӧм A-IS_TOM  "" ;
сиктсайса:сиктсайса A_  "" ;
сотчытӧм:сотчытӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "" ;
судитлытӧм:судитлытӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "" ;
сусьытӧм:сусьытӧм A-IS_TOM  "" ;
сьӧда-лӧза:сьӧда-лӧза A_  "musta ja sininen" ;
сімтӧм:сімтӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "" ;
сӧгластӧм:сӧгластӧм A-IS_TOM  "vastahakoinen" ;
тиньгана:тиньгана Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "" ;
топӧдтӧм:топӧдтӧм A-IS_TOM  "" ;
тошка:тошка A_  "parrakas" ;
туйтӧм:туйтӧм A-IS_TOM  "sopimaton" ;
турунзьысь:турунзьысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "" ;
тшӧтшӧдтӧм:тшӧтшӧдтӧм A-IS_TOM  "" ;
тыдалысь:тыдалысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "näkyvä" ;
тіралана:тіралана Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "" ;
убыткатӧм:убыткатӧм A-IS_TOM  "tappioton" ;
увдорса:увдорса A_  "" ;
чегсьысь:чегсьысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "" ;
чегъясьысь:чегъясьысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "" ;
чинтӧм:чинтӧм A-IS_TOM  "" ;
чойӧсь:чойӧсь A_  "" ;
чолӧмалана:чолӧмалана Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "" ;
чужтӧм:чужтӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "" ;
шкоркнитана:шкоркнитана Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "" ;
шуана:шуана Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "suullinen" ;
шума:шума A_  "" ;
шумтӧм:шумтӧм A-IS_TOM  "" ;
шыасьысь:шыасьысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "" ;
шыбитана:шыбитана Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "" ;
ыдждӧдлана:ыдждӧдлана Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "" ;
ыдъясьысь:ыдъясьысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "" ;
ыпъялана:ыпъялана Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "" ;
ыркӧдана:ыркӧдана Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "" ;
ышмысь:ышмысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "vallaton" ;
эновтлытӧм:эновтлытӧм A-IS_TOM  "" ;
эралана:эралана Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "" ;
этшъясьысь:этшъясьысь Adj-IS_PTC-YSJ  "" ;
юктӧм:юктӧм Adj-IS_PTC-TOM  "" ;
юмов:юмо A_PARAGOGIC-В/Л  "" ;
юралана:юралана Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "" ;
яндысьтӧм:яндысьтӧм A-IS_TOM  "" ;
янӧдана:янӧдана Adj-IS_PTC-ANA  "" ;
яръюгыд:яръюгыд A_  "kirkas" ;
